Tennessee, session 114, HB0447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-21-236, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
( ) The department, in consultation with the inmate disciplinary oversight board,
shall compose a report detailing the number of inmates who earned sentence reduction
credits under this section and shall submit the report to the senate judiciary committee
and the committee of the house of representatives with jurisdiction over subject matters
pertaining to criminal sentencing.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0447
001812
- 1 -